Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.250

School property used for public purposes.

School boards in each district of the second class may provide for the free, comfortable and convenient use of the school property to promote and facilitate frequent meetings and association of the people in discussion, study, improvement, recreation and other community purposes, and may acquire, assemble and house material for the dissemination of information of use and interest to the farm, the home and the community, and facilities for experiment and study, especially in matters pertaining to the growing of crops, the improvement and handling of livestock, the marketing of farm products, the planning and construction of farm buildings, the subjects of household economies, home industries, good roads, and community vocations and industries; and may call meetings for the consideration and discussion of any such matters, employ a special supervisor, or leader, if need be, and provide suitable dwellings and accommodations for teachers, supervisors and necessary assistants.

[ 1975 c 43 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.190. Prior: 1913 c 129 s 1; RRS s 4837. Formerly RCW 28A.60.190, 28.63.190.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.